Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 8. Community Assistance Program.

Effective dates. —

Section 15, ch. 12, SLA 2008 makes this article effective April 9, 2008, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 29.60.850.
Community Assistance Fund.

The community assistance fund is established in the general fund for the purpose of making community assistance payments to municipalities, reserves, and communities for any public purpose. The fund consists of appropriations. Income earned on money in the fund may be appropriated to the fund. Money in the fund does not lapse.

Each fiscal year, the legislature may appropriate to the community assistance fund money received by the state during the previous calendar year under AS

43.20.030(c)

. The amount may not exceed the greater of

$30,000,000; or

the amount that, when added to the fund balance on June 30 of the previous fiscal year, equals $90,000,000.

The balance in the community assistance fund shall be determined on June 30 of each year. If the fund balance is at least $15,000,000, without further appropriation, the department shall distribute one-third of that amount as community assistance payments for the immediately following fiscal year. Otherwise, no payments may be made.

Notwithstanding the guidelines in (b) of this section, the legislature may appropriate any amount to the community assistance fund. Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2013; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 44 SLA 2016; am § 28 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective August 19, 2013, in (b), deleted “an amount equal to 20 percent of the” following “community revenue sharing fund”, and substituted “AS

43.20.030(c)

” for “AS

43.55.011(g)

”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing” in 2 places; in (b), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing”; inserted “the greater of” following “may not exceed”; substituted “$30,000,000” for “$60,000,000” and $90,000,000” for “$180,000,000”; in (c), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing” in 2 places; substituted “$15,000,000” for “$60,000,000”.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (d), substituted “community assistance fund” for “community revenue sharing fund” following “appropriate any amount to the”.

Sec. 29.60.855.
Basic community assistance payments.

The basic amount used for determining the basic community assistance payment for a fiscal year is $300,000. However, if the amount available for payments for that fiscal year under AS

29.60.850(c)

is less than the amount necessary to make the payments under (b) of this section, the department shall reduce the basic amount pro rata.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the basic community assistance payment for a fiscal year equals, for each

unified municipality, the sum of the amounts calculated under (2) and (3) of this subsection, rounded to the nearest dollar;

borough, the basic amount, rounded to the nearest dollar;

city and eligible reserve, one-fourth of the basic amount, rounded to the nearest dollar;

eligible community in the unorganized borough, one-twelfth of the basic amount, rounded to the nearest dollar;

eligible community in a unified municipality or borough, one- nineteenth of the basic amount, rounded to the nearest dollar.

The basic community assistance payment amount for a succeeding municipality formed when two or more municipalities merge, consolidate, or unify after January 1, 2002, equals the sum of the amounts each of the former municipalities would receive under (b) of this section calculated as if the merger, consolidation, or unification had not occurred.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 8 ch 44 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “department shall calculate the” preceding “basic amount”, substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing”, deleted “by applying the following formula: the amount available for payments for that fiscal year under AS

29.60.850(c)

, minus 60,000,000, divided by 60,000,000, plus one, multiplied by 384,000. However, if the amount calculated is less than $220,000, the basic amount for that fiscal year” following “for a fiscal year”, substituted “$300,000” for “$220,000”, inserted “However, if the amount available for payments for that fiscal year under AS

29.60.850(c)

is less than the amount necessary to make the payments under (b) of this section, the department shall reduce the basic amount pro rata.” at the end of the subsection; in (b), in the introductory language, substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing”, in (b)(1) and (2), substituted “dollar” for “$1,000”, in (b)(3), (4) and (5), substituted “dollar” for “$100”; in (c), substituted “community assistance” for “revenue sharing”.

Sec. 29.60.860.
Per capita payment increases.

Subject to (b) of this section, if the amount available for distribution under AS

29.60.850(c)

exceeds the amount needed to fully fund all the basic community assistance payments, the balance shall be distributed on a per capita basis to municipalities, to reserves, and to communities in the unorganized borough.

The per capita amount distributed to each community in the unorganized borough may not, when added to the basic community assistance payment for that community, exceed the basic amount calculated under AS

29.60.855(b)(3)

. If the per capita distribution for a community in the unorganized borough, when added to the basic community assistance payment for that community, would exceed the basic amount calculated under AS

29.60.855(b)(3)

, the excess amount shall be distributed on a per capita basis to other communities in the unorganized borough.

For purposes of this section, the population of a municipality, reserve, or community shall be determined by using the numbers of permanent fund dividend recipients or other population data that the department determines is reliable. For purposes of determining the population of a borough, the population of each city in the borough shall be deducted from the total borough population.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 46 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§ 9, 10 ch 44 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b), in the second sentence, substituted “in the unorganized borough, when added to the basic community revenue sharing payment for that community, would exceed” for “exceeds”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing”; in (b), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing” twice.

Sec. 29.60.865.
Eligibility requirements for reserves and communities.

The department, with advice from the Department of Law, shall determine whether there is in each community or reserve an incorporated nonprofit entity or a Native village council that will agree to receive and spend the community assistance payment. If there is more than one qualified entity in a reserve or community in the unorganized borough, the department shall pay the money to the entity that the department finds most qualified to receive and spend the money on behalf of the reserve or community. The department may not make a community assistance payment to a Native village council unless the council waives immunity from suit for claims arising out of activities of the council related to the payment. A waiver of immunity from suit under this section must be on a form provided by the Department of Law. If there is no qualified incorporated nonprofit entity or Native village council in a reserve or community that is willing to receive the community assistance payment and use the payment on behalf of that reserve or community, the payment for that reserve or community may not be paid. Neither this section nor any action taken under it enlarges or diminishes the governmental authority or jurisdiction of a Native village council.

The department may make a community assistance payment on behalf of a community in a borough or unified municipality only to the municipality for payment by the municipality to an incorporated nonprofit entity or Native village council that has been approved by the assembly and meets the requirements of (a) of this section. The department shall have written evidence of the assembly approval. If there is more than one qualified entity in a community in a borough or unified municipality, one of the entities may receive the entire payment, or the payment may be shared between two or more of the qualified entities, as determined by the assembly.

A community in a borough or unified municipality is eligible for a community assistance payment only if at least three of the following services are generally available to all residents of the community and each of the three services, in any combination, are provided by one or more qualifying incorporated nonprofit entities or a Native village council or are substantially paid for by the residents of the community through taxes, charges, or assessments levied or authorized by the borough or unified municipality:

fire protection;

emergency medical;

water and sewer;

solid waste management;

public road or ice road maintenance;

public health;

search and rescue.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 11 ch 44 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), (b) and (c), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing” in 5 places.

Sec. 29.60.879.
Definitions.

In AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

,

“community” means a place in the unorganized borough, in a borough, or in a unified municipality that is not incorporated as a municipality, that is not a reserve, and in which 25 or more individuals reside as a social unit;

“reserve” means a place that is organized under federal law as an Indian reserve that existed before enactment of 43 U.S.C. 1618(a) and is continued in existence under that subsection.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 2008)